Hawaii statutes.
§454F-15 Investigation and examination
authority. (a) In addition to any other authority under this chapter, the
commissioner shall have the authority to conduct investigations and
examinations. The commissioner may access, receive, and use any books,
accounts, records, files, documents, information, or evidence, including:

(1) Criminal, civil, and administrative history
information, including nonconviction data under chapter 853;

(2) Personal history and experience information
including independent credit reports obtained from a consumer reporting agency
described in section 603(p) of the Fair Credit Reporting Act; and

(3) Any other documents, information, or evidence the
commissioner deems relevant to the inquiry or investigation, regardless of the
location, possession, control, or custody of the documents, information, or
evidence.

(b) For the purposes of investigating
violations or complaints arising under this chapter, or for the purposes of
examination, the commissioner may review, investigate, or examine any licensee
or person subject to this chapter, as often as necessary to carry out the
purposes of this chapter. The commissioner may direct, subpoena, or order the
attendance of, and examine under oath all persons whose testimony may be required
about loans or the business or subject matter of any examination or
investigation, and may direct, subpoena, or order the person to produce books,
accounts, records, files, and any other documents the commissioner deems
relevant to the inquiry.

(c) Each licensee or person subject to this
chapter shall provide to the commissioner upon request, the books and records
relating to the operations of the licensee or person subject to this chapter.
The commissioner shall have access to the books and records and shall be
permitted to interview the officers, principals, mortgage loan originators,
employees, independent contractors, agents, and customers of the licensed
mortgage loan originator, individual, or person subject to this chapter
concerning their business.

(d) Each licensee or person subject to this
chapter shall make or compile reports or prepare other information as directed
by the commissioner in order to carry out the purposes of this section,
including:

(1) Accounting compilations;

(2) Information lists and data concerning loan
transactions in a format prescribed by the commissioner; or

(3) Other information deemed necessary to carry out
the purposes of this section.

(e) In making any examination or investigation
authorized by this chapter, the commissioner may control access to any
documents and records of the licensee or person under examination or
investigation. The commissioner may take possession of the documents and
records or place a person in exclusive charge of the documents and records in
the place where they are usually kept. During the period of control, no person
shall remove or attempt to remove any of the documents and records except
pursuant to a court order or with the consent of the commissioner. Unless the
commissioner has reasonable grounds to believe the documents or records of the
licensee or person under examination or investigation have been, or are at risk
of being altered or destroyed for purposes of concealing a violation of this
chapter, the licensee or owner of the documents and records shall have access
to the documents or records as necessary to conduct its ordinary business
affairs.

(f) To carry out the purposes of this chapter,
the commissioner may:

(1) Retain attorneys, accountants, or other
professionals and specialists, who may be exempt from chapter 76, as examiners,
auditors, or investigators to conduct or assist in the conduct of examinations
or investigations;

(2) Enter into agreements or relationships with other
government officials or regulatory associations in order to improve
efficiencies and reduce regulatory burden by sharing resources, standardized or
uniform methods or procedures, and documents, records, information, or evidence
obtained under this section;

(3) Use, hire, contract, or employ public or
privately available analytical systems, methods, or software to examine or
investigate the licensee or person subject to this chapter;

(4) Accept and rely on examination or investigation
reports made by other government officials, within or without this State; and

(5) Accept audit reports made by an independent
certified public accountant for the licensee or person subject to this chapter
in the course of that part of the examination covering the same general subject
matter as the audit and may incorporate the audit report in the report of the
examination, report of investigation, or other writing of the commissioner.

(g) The authority of this section shall remain
in effect, whether a licensee or person subject to this chapter acts or claims
to act under any licensing or registration law of this State, or claims to act
without such authority.

(h) No licensee or person subject to
investigation or examination under this section may knowingly withhold,
abstract, remove, mutilate, destroy, or secrete any books, records, computer
records, or other information.

(i) The commissioner may charge an examination
or investigation fee, payable to the division, based upon the cost per hour per
examiner for all licensees and persons subject to this chapter examined or
investigated by the commissioner or the commissioner's staff. The hourly fee
shall be $60 or an amount as the commissioner shall establish by rule pursuant
to chapter 91. In addition to the examination or investigation fee, the
commissioner may charge any person that is examined or investigated by the
commissioner or the commissioner's staff pursuant to this section additional
amounts for travel, per diem, mileage, and other reasonable expenses incurred
in connection with the examination or investigation, payable to the division.

(j) Any person having reason to believe that
this chapter or the rules adopted pursuant thereto have been violated, or that
a license issued under this chapter should be suspended or revoked, may file a
written complaint with the commissioner setting forth the details of the
alleged violation or grounds for suspension or revocation. [L Sp 2009, c 32, pt
of §2; am L 2010, c 84, §20; am L 2013, c 168, §15]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next